Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-249
Expense of issue.

(MBCA 6.28) A corporation may pay the expenses
of selling or underwriting its shares and of organizing or reorganizing the
corporation from the consideration received for shares.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 49.